
























Cat | Products | Caterpillar









































				Built for it
                


















Products & Services – North America



Products















The Cat equipment product line, consisting of more than 300 machines, sets the standard for our industry. We plan to help you meet your needs with our equipment, with our distribution and product support system, and the continual introduction and updating of products.





New Products

Cat equipment sets the standard for our industry. We will remain the leader by continuing to help our customers meet their needs with durable and reliable equipment.


Rental Products

Cat Rental gives you the flexibility each job demands with the performance and productivity you depend upon. With one call or click, what you need is on its way – no matter how much, how soon or for how long.


Used Products

Used inventory includes trucks, dozers motor graders, loaders, forklifts, engines, generator sets, work tool and more.




Genuine Cat® Parts

Order Genuine Cat parts, tools and materials you need to keep your equipment and your business running at peak performance.


Gifts & Apparel

Genuine Cat® clothing, footwear, toys, scale models, accessories, and more. The one-stop spot for all official Caterpillar licensed merchandise. Genuine Caterpillar apparel, footwear/shoes/boots, toys, scale models, accessories, and more.

















9,520 Reasons to Try New Compaction Technology 
Compaction Technology - TENA SA in northern Greece uses Cat Machine Drive Power to help eliminate thousands of passes, doubling working speed. 

					        	
									
									
										Learn More 
									
							
					        	
					        	









1.9% Financing For 72 Months With Monthly Payments As Low As $978.

								
									
										SEE OFFER DETAILS
									
									
							
								
								






Electric Power Application Center
SpecSizer evaluates load types, collects data and organizes it to help you select the generator set that’s best for you. Find product comparisons, technical data, product sizing and more using our technical information portal (TIP) specifically created for consultants, architects, engineers, and owners. Check out these valuable resources now at our Application Center! 

					        	
									
									
										Learn More 
									
							
					        	
					        	












Electric Power Social Media 
Check out the Cat® Electric Power social media page for the latest news, preventive maintenance tips, and product and show announcements.

					        	
									
										Learn More
									
									
							
					        	
					        	






Cat® Dealers Make the Difference
Your Cat dealer is committed to maximizing your success, helping you get the most out of your operations with site-level solutions, service and support.

							        		
												
													Connect with your dealer today
												
												
																	        	
							        	
							        	






Project Financing
No project is the same - from the application to the power need. That’s why we offer a range of project financing options.

					        			  
												
													    	See Our Offers
												
												
												
					    






Electric Power News
Read the latest electric power news and articles relating to Cat electric power products by people in the know, on topics that matter to your business.  

					        	
												
													    	Read more
												
												
												
					        	





















Eq-Inc













Home
Encyclopedia of Small Business
 Eq-Inc


		       Eq-Inc
		    
Equity Financing
Equity financing is a strategy for obtaining capital that involves selling a partial interest in the company to investors. The equity, or ownership position, that investors receive in exchange for their funds usually takes the form of stock in the company. 
Ergonomics
Ergonomics is the process of changing the work environment (equipment, furniture, pace of work, etc.) to fit the physical requirements and limitations of employees, rather than forcing workers to adapt to jobs that can, over time, have a debilitating effect on their physical well-being. Companies of all shapes and sizes have increasingly recognized that establishing an ergonomically sensitive work environment for employees can produce bottom-line benefits in cutting absenteeism, reducing health care costs, and increasing productivity. 
Estate Tax
Estate taxes are taxes due to the federal government upon the death of the owner of a business or estate. At first glance, IRS figures indicate that the tax has a far greater impact on wealthy individuals than on small business owners, but representatives of the latter group insist that it has long been a dreaded levy that packs a deceptive punch among small businesses. 
European Union (EU)
The European Union (EU), formerly known as the European Community (EC), was formed in the 1950s to encourage and oversee political and economic cooperation between numerous European nations. In the nearly half-century since it was formed, the EU has gradually succeeded in becoming the dominant governing economic body in Europe, and it now affects every aspect of business in its member states.
Expense Accounts
Expense accounts, also called expense allowances, are plans under which companies reimburse employees for business-related expenses. These expenses include travel, entertainment, gifts, and other expenses related to the employer's business activity. 
Export-Import Bank
The United States Export-Import (Ex-Im) Bank, originally established in 1945, is an independent agency that was created to help finance U.S. exports to industrializing and developing markets by providing loans, credit guarantees, and insurance. 
Exporting
Exporting is the practice of sending or carrying merchandise to a foreign country for trade or sale. International business is a potentially lucrative area for many businesses, but the small business owner should be aware that establishing oneself in a foreign market is a complex, time-consuming task. 
Exporting—Financing and Pricing
One of the most important elements in establishing a successful exporting business is understanding financing and pricing issues associated with international trade. Production costs and product pricing are profoundly interrelated aspects of any business venture; an enterprise has to fully understand its marketing, production, distribution, and other operating costs if it hopes to make an informed decision regarding pricing strategies for its product line. 
Facility Layout and Design
Facility layout and design is an important component of a business's overall operations, both in terms of maximizing the effectiveness of production processes and meeting employee needs and/or desires. Writing in Production and Operations Management, Howard J. 
Facility Management
In an article for Managing Office Technology, Kit Tuveson defined facility management as "the coordination of the physical workplace with the people and work of an organization. It integrates the principles of business administration, architecture, and the behavioral and engineering sciences." In the most basic terms, facility management encompasses all activities related to keeping a complex operating. 
Factoring
Factoring is a form of financing in which a business sells its receivables to a third party or "factor company" at a discounted price. Under this arrangement, the factor agrees to provide financing and other services to the selling business in return for interest and fees on the money that they advanced against receivables invoices. 
Family Limited Partnership
Family limited partnerships (sometimes known as FLPs) are an increasingly popular succession planning alternative utilized by owners of family businesses who want to pass the establishment on to their children without being hit by heavy federal taxes. Neil Alexander, writing in Best's Review, described the family limited partnership as "a legal agreement that allows business owners and their children to address several tax, business-succession, and estate-planning needs all at once. 
Family and Medical Leave Act
The Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) provides employees who qualify with up to 12 work weeks of unpaid, job-protected leave in a 12-month period for specified family and medical reasons. It also requires group health benefits to be maintained during the leave as if employees continued to work instead of taking leave. 
Family-Owned Businesses
A family-owned business is any business in which two or more family members are involved and the majority of ownership or control lies within a family. Family-owned businesses may be the oldest form of business organization, and today they are recognized as important and distinct participants in the world economy. 
Feasibility Study
A feasibility study is a detailed analysis of a company and its operations that is conducted in order to predict the results of a specific future course of action. Small business owners may find it helpful to conduct a feasibility study whenever they anticipate making an important strategic decision. 
Federal Trade Commission (FTC)
The Federal Trade Commission (FTC) was established as an independent administrative agency pursuant to the Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914. The purpose of the FTC is to enforce the provisions of the Federal Trade Commission Act, which prohibits "unfair or deceptive acts or practices in commerce." The Clayton Antitrust Act (1914) also granted the FTC the authority to act against specific and unfair monopolistic practices. 
Fica Taxes
Federal Insurance Contribution Act (FICA) taxes, which include contributions to federal Social Security and Medicare programs, must be paid by all American workers, whether they are employed by a company or are self-employed. Small businesses that employ persons other than the owner or partners are required to withhold FICA taxes—along with regular income taxes—from the wages paid to employees, remit these taxes to the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), and make regularly scheduled reports to the IRS about the amount of taxes owed and paid. 
Fiduciary Duty
Fiduciary duty is a legal requirement of loyalty and care that applies to any person or organization that has a fiduciary relationship with another person or organization. A fiduciary is a person, committee, or organization that has agreed to accept legal ownership or control and management of an asset or group of assets belonging to someone else. 
Finance Companies
Commercial finance companies have in recent years become a favorite option for entrepreneurs seeking small business loans. These institutions generally charge higher interest rates than banks and credit unions, but they also are more likely to approve a loan request. 
Finance and Financial Management
Finance and financial management encompass numerous business and governmental activities. In the most basic sense, the term finance can be used to describe the activities of a firm attempting to raise capital through the sale of stocks, bonds, or other promissory notes. 
Financial Analysis
Financial analysis is an aspect of the overall business finance function that involves examining historical data to gain information about the current and future financial health of a company. Financial analysis can be applied in a wide variety of situations to give business managers the information they need to make critical decisions. 
Financial Planners
A good financial planner will conduct an in-depth interview to gather information about the client's income, expenses, assets, liabilities, future goals, and risk tolerance. Then the planner will use this information to develop a detailed, written financial plan specifically for the client. 
Financial Ratios
Financial ratios illustrate relationships between different aspects of a small business's operations. They involve the comparison of elements from a balance sheet or income statement, and are crafted with particular points of focus in mind. 
Financial Statements
Financial statements are written records of business finances, including balance sheets and profit and loss statements. They stand as one of the most essential components of business information, and as the principal method of communicating financial information about an entity to outside parties. 
Firewalls
A firewall is a computer security device that is situated between a small business's internal network and the Internet. It can work at either the software or the hardware level to prevent unwanted outside access to the company's computer system. 
Fiscal Year
A fiscal year is any 52-week period used consistently by an organization for the purposes of financial reporting and policy setting. It may or may not correspond with the typical calendar year of January to December. 
Fixed and Variable Expenses
Fixed and variable expenses are the two main components of a company's total overhead expense. Fixed costs are those that do not fluctuate with changes in production activity level or sales volume, such as rent, insurance, dues and subscriptions, equipment leases, payments on loans, depreciation, management salaries, and advertising. 
Flexible Benefit Plans
Flexible benefit plans allow employees to choose the benefits they want or need from a package of programs offered by an employer. Flexible benefit plans may include health insurance, retirement benefits such as 401(k) plans, and reimbursement accounts that employees can use to pay for out-of-pocket health or dependent care expenses. 
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
A flexible spending account (FSA) is a tax-deferred savings account established by an employer to help employees meet certain medical and dependent-care expenses that are not covered under the employer's insurance plan. Established under Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code, FSAs were once known as medical Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs). 
Flexible Work Arrangements
Flexible work programs are work arrangements wherein employees are given greater scheduling freedom in how they fulfill the obligations of their positions. The most commonplace of these programs is flextime, which gives workers far greater leeway in terms of the time when they begin and end work, provided they put in the total number of hours required by the employer. 
Flow Charts
A flow chart, or flow diagram, is a graphical representation of a process or system that details the sequencing of steps required to create output. A typical flow chart uses a set of basic symbols to represent various functions, and shows the sequence and interconnection of functions with lines and arrows. 
Focus Groups
A focus group is a marketing research tool in which a small group of people (typically eight to ten individuals) engages in a roundtable discussion of selected topics of interest in an informal setting. The focus group discussion is typically directed by a moderator who guides the discussion in order to obtain the group's opinions about or reactions to specific products or marketing-oriented issues, known as test concepts. 
Forecasting
Forecasting can be broadly considered as a method or a technique for estimating many future aspects of a business or other operation. Planning for the future is a critical aspect of managing any organization, and small business enterprises are no exception. 
Fortune 500
The term Fortune 500 refers to an annual listing by Fortune magazine of the top 500 public companies in the U.S., as ranked by sales, assets, earnings, and capitalization. This list ranks only public companies, or those which have issued securities through an offering and which are traded on the stock market. 
401(K) Plans
A 401(k) plan is a tax-deferred, defined-contribution retirement plan. The name comes from a section of the Internal Revenue Code that permits an employer to create a retirement plan to which employees may voluntarily contribute a portion of their compensation on a pre-tax basis. 
Franchising
Franchising is a kind of licensing arrangement wherein a business owner, known as the "franchisor," distributes or markets a trademarked product or service through affiliated dealers, who are known as "franchisees." While these franchisees own their establishments, terms of franchising agreements typically require them to share operational responsibilities with the franchisor.
Free-Lance Employment/Independent Contractors
Free-lance employees, also known as independent contractors, are individuals who work on their own, without a long-term contractual commitment to any one employer. A free-lance employee usually performs services or completes work assignments under short-term contracts with several employers, or clients, who have the right to control only the final result of the individual's work, rather than the specific means used to get the work done. 
Gender Discrimination
Gender discrimination, also known as sexual discrimination, is the practice of letting a person's sex unfairly become a factor when deciding who receives a job, promotion, or other employment benefit. It most often affects women who feel they have been unfairly discriminated against in favor of a man. 
Globalization
Globalization is the process by which the economies of countries around the world become increasingly integrated over time. This integration occurs as technological advances expedite the trade of goods and services, the flow of capital, and the migration of people across international borders. 
Goodwill
Goodwill is a type of intangible business asset. It is defined as the difference between the fair market value of a company's assets (less its liabilities) and the market price or asking price for the overall company. 
Government Procurement
Many small businesses maintain and increase their operations through reliance on local, state, and federal government contracts. While these businesses may also secure business through the offering of competitive bids on jobs offered by the private sector, small business owners should be aware of the differences in procuring work from the public and private sectors. 
Graphical User Interface
A graphical user interface (GUI, pronounced "gooey") is a computer environment that simplifies the user's interaction with the computer by representing programs, commands, files, and other options as visual elements, such as icons, pull-down menus, buttons, scroll bars, windows, and dialog boxes. By selecting one of these graphical elements, through either use of a mouse or a selection from a menu, the user can initiate different activities, such as starting a program or printing a document. 
Green Marketing
Environmentally-responsible or "green" marketing is a business practice that takes into account consumer concerns about promoting preservation and conservation of the natural environment. Green marketing campaigns highlight the superior environmental protection characteristics of a company's products and services, whether those benefits take the form of reduced waste in packaging, increased energy efficiency in product use, or decreased release of toxic emissions and other pollutants in production. 
Green Production
Green production is a business strategy that focuses on profitability through environmentally friendly operating processes. Proponents of this management philosophy contend that green production is a sensible course to follow not only because of the benefits that it bestows on the natural environment, but also because of its fundamental strategic soundness. 
Grievance Procedures
Grievance procedures are a means of dispute resolution that can be used to address complaints by employees against management or to settle disputes between a company and its suppliers, customers, or competitors. The best-known application of grievance procedures is as a formal process outlined in labor union contracts. 
Groupthink
Groupthink occurs when the pressure to conform within a group interferes with that group's analysis of a problem and causes poor group decision making. Individual creativity, uniqueness, and independent thinking are lost in the pursuit of group cohesiveness, as are the advantages that can sometimes be obtained by making a decision as a group—bringing different sources of ideas, knowledge, and experience together to solve a problem. 
Groupware
Groupware is a category of software designed to help groups work together by facilitating the exchange of information among group members who may or may not be located in the same office. Often, groupware users are collaborating on the same project, although groupware can be used to share a variety of information throughout an entire organization and can also be extended to clients, suppliers, and other users outside the organization. 
Health Insurance Options
Health insurance is a contractual agreement between an individual or group and an insurance provider through which the insurance provider agrees to pay for some or all of the health care costs incurred by the person or group in exchange for their regular payment of a sum known as a premium. In this way, the insurance company assumes the financial risk of reimbursing health care costs, but it is able to offset that risk by collecting premiums from a large number of people, many of whom will have very low medical expenses. 
Health Maintenance Organizations and Preferred Provider Organizations
Health Maintenance Organizations (HMOs) and Preferred Provider Organizations (PPOs) administer the most common types of managed care health insurance plans. Managed care plans typically arrange to provide medical services for members in exchange for subscription fees paid to the plan sponsor—usually an HMO or PPO. 
Health Promotion Programs
A health promotion program—sometimes known as a wellness program—is a type of employee benefit that encompasses the various efforts companies make to promote and maintain their employees' health. Examples of health promotion programs might include company-sponsored smoking cessation training, visits with a nutritionist to receive information about healthy cooking, discounted fitness center memberships, or free cholesterol testing.
High-Tech Business
High-technology businesses are those enterprises engaged in securing growth and revenue from industry sectors characterized by rapidly changing and advanced technology. In fact, advanced technology has come to be utilized in so many different industries that members of the business community now often regard it as its own unique industry subset, with applications across the spectrum of the world of commerce. 
Home Offices
A home office is a space within an individual's personal residence that is used for business purposes. It may be a corner of a spare bedroom equipped with nothing more than a desk. 
Home-Based Business
A home-based business is any enterprise for which the principal administrative and managerial activities take place within an individual's personal residence. People start home-based business ventures for a wide variety of reasons. 
Hoteling
Hoteling is a form of "alternative officing" which allows employees who travel on business or work flexible hours to reserve desk space at the employer's offices as needed, rather than maintaining a permanent work space there. This allows the employer to make more efficient use of office space and thus reduce costs. 
Html
Hypertext Markup Language (HTML) is an authoring tool that is used in creating Internet Web pages. It is the preferred tool for those who wish to make their Web page more accessible and userfriendly because it is able to accelerate downloading over the Internet, although its quickness comes at the expense of formatting control. 
Hubzone Empowerment Contracting Program
The HUBZone Empowerment Contracting Program is an initiative of the U.S. Small Business Administration (SBA) that gives preference in securing federal contracts to small businesses located in "historically underutilized business zones," or HUBZones. 
Human Resource Management
Human Resource Management (HRM) is the term used to describe formal systems devised for the management of people within an organization. These human resources responsibilities are generally divided into three major areas of management: staffing, employee compensation, and defining/designing work. 
Human Resource Management and the Law
The field of human resources management is greatly influenced and shaped by state and federal employment legislation. Indeed, regulations and laws govern all aspects of human resource management, including recruitment, placement, development, and compensation areas.
Human Resource Policies
Human resource policies are the formal rules and guidelines that businesses put in place to hire, train, assess, and reward the members of their work force. These policies, when organized and disseminated in an easily used form—such as an employee manual or large postings—can go far toward eliminating any misunderstandings between employees and employers about their rights and obligations in the business environment. 
Income Statements
An income statement presents the results of a company's operations for a given reporting period. Along with the balance sheet, the statement of cash flows, and the statement of changes in owners' equity, the income statement is one of the primary means of financial reporting. 



















Green Production - advantage, benefits, cost, Defining and instituting green production processes













Home
Encyclopedia of Small Business
 Eq-Inc
 Green Production



      GREEN PRODUCTION
    










      Green production is a business strategy that focuses on profitability
      through environmentally friendly operating processes. Proponents of this
      management philosophy contend that green production is a sensible course
      to follow not only because of the benefits that it bestows on the natural
      environment, but also because of its fundamental strategic soundness. As
      Stuart Hart, director of the University of Michigan's Corporate
      Environmental Management Program (CEMP), indicated in 
      
        Northwest Environmental Journal,
      
       "green business strategies based on the principle of environmental
      sustainability may constitute a key basis for competitive advantage in the
      coming decades." Other business observers concur with this
      evaluation. Writing in 
      
        Business Horizons,
      
       J. Stephen Shi and Jane M. Kane asserted that many companies that take a
      proactive stance toward environmental improvements in production have a
      decided advantage over businesses that are indifferent to—or
      actively oppose—new standards: "First, they gain a
      'greener' image in the public eye. Second, because adopting
      new standards takes time and money, they have more time to develop methods
      for reducing waste and can do so on their own schedule. Companies that
      wait until they are forced to change often find themselves in an
      expensive, last-minute scramble to meet the requirements. As a result,
      they end up throwing more money at the problem for a less effective
      solution than their more proactive counterparts."
    

      DEFINING AND INSTITUTING GREEN PRODUCTION PROCESSES
    

      Many people think that green production simply entails instituting
      pollution controls or recycling programs when manufacturing goods. The
      reality, however, is that green production processes seek to minimize the
      impact of the manufacturing process on the environment at every stage. As
      Hart observed in 
      
        Northwest Environmental Journal,
      
       "pollution prevention … can only deliver half the loaf:
      Green production also means that firms transform their input (raw material
      use) and output (product disposition) processes." George Zinkhan
      and Les Carlson agreed, stating in the 
      
        Journal of Advertising
      
       that green consumers "are worried about more than just the
      purchase and the consumption processes. They are also concerned about the
      production process, in terms of scarce resources consumed." Taking
      all these factors into consideration, Hart and P. Shrivastava defined
      green production as follows in a study titled "Greening
      Organizations": "Green production focuses upon three
      fundamental goals: 1) minimize emissions, effluents, and accidents; 2)
      minimize the use of virgin materials and non-renewable forms of energy;
      and 3) minimize the life-cycle cost (cradle to grave) of products or
      services."
    



          "GREEN" USE OF RAW MATERIALS
        

       "Growing concerns over depletion of forests and other natural
      resources, and environmental degradation created by mining and fossil fuel
      production," remarked Hart, "suggest that corporations may
      need to rethink their raw material and procurement strategies."
      Significant sectors of the business community—especially large
      corporations engaged in the lumber and energy industries—continue
      to take issue with such sentiments, arguing that resources remain
      plentiful. But many other businesses, citing the findings of both the
      scientific and environmental communities (or the internal data of their
      marketing arms), have begun to make changes in the ways that they gather
      raw materials for their products. Reliance on recyclable or renewable
      materials, new energy and material conservation initiatives, and
      "replenishment" programs (such as forest replanting
      programs) have all been touted as effective tools in establishing
      processes that do not unduly harm the environment.
    



          GREEN MANUFACTURING/PRODUCTION PROCESSES
        

       Information from industry studies and consumer research is being used to
      develop new products and to redesign existing products and services in
      order to reduce their impact on the environment. In its book 
      
        Green Products by Design,
      
       the U.S. Office of Technology Assessment (OTA) advocated green design as
      a thoroughly viable goal "in which environmental attributes are
      treated as design objectives, rather than as constraints…. green
      design incorporates environ-mental objectives with minimum loss to product
      performance, useful life or functionality." In fact, supporters of
      green production assert that it makes financial sense for businesses of
      all sizes and shapes to undertake the process of green design.
      "Wasteful and polluting throughput processes lead to inefficient
      use of material and human resources as well as occupational and public
      health risks," wrote Hart in 
      
        Northwest Environmental Journal.
      
       "Just as the 'zero-defects' goal in quality control
      demands preventative action and continuous improvement at every production
      step, a 'zero-waste' goal can focus efforts toward the
      virtual elimination of pollution. This preventative approach has proven
      far more efficient than efforts aimed at controlling discharges at the
      'end of the pipe.' Corporations are realizing that pollution
      prevention can be a cost saving activity (e.g. by lowering compliance,
      waste treatment, disposal, and raw material costs)." Subsequently,
      some businesses have increasingly steered their product and packaging
      designs to use less materials or to be easily disassembled so that
      high-value components can be recycled or refurbished more readily.
    

      Analysts generally agree that product packaging is one of the most visible
      and important elements of an environmentally sensitive production
      operation. Examples of green packaging include the use of recycled content
      in packaging materials, source reduction, and refill alternatives.
      Whatever form the packaging takes, it should clearly state whether green
      claims pertain to the product or to its package. "If the particular
      environmental quality that is lauded applies only to a portion or
      component of the product or packaging, this fact must also be clearly
      indicated," explained Shi and Kane. "For example, a
      manufacturer of aluminum foil displays a 'recyclable' claim
      on a box of aluminum foil with no qualifications. But if only the foil and
      not the box is recyclable, the claim is deceptive. The manufacturer must
      instead distinguish between the product and the packaging in claiming such
      recyclability. The exception to this rule is when only a minor, incidental
      component of the product or packaging is not recyclable."
    



          THE "ENVIRONMENTALLY SUSTAINABLE" COMPANY
        

       As Shrivastava and Hart remarked in "Greening
      Organizations," companies that wish to embrace green production
      philosophies and processes after years of indifference usually have to
      redesign significant aspects of the business, including its mission and
      vision, competitive strategies, core technological systems, performance
      measurement and reward systems, and organizational processes and culture
      (of course, this task is more formidable for larger companies than it is
      for small and mid-sized firms). Of the above elements of a business,
      perhaps none is more important than "mission and vision,"
      for all the other aspects of the organization are fundamentally shaped by
      those values. But while the process of establishing a green production
      company can be quite daunting, proponents argue that cost savings
      associated with pollution prevention efforts, coupled with marketplace
      benefits in the realms of reputation and consumer loyalty, can make the
      shift a beneficial one not only for the environment, but also for the
      company itself.
    

      SMALL BUSINESS AND GREEN PRODUCTION
    

      Although most media attention on green production has been directed at the
      efforts of big corporations, increasing numbers of small companies have
      successfully established ecologically sensitive business practices as
      well. Indeed, some small companies operate in regions or industries that
      are ideally suited to green production. Many companies that provide goods
      (equipment and clothing manufacturers) or services (retail stores, guiding
      services) to backpackers, anglers, mountain bikers, canoeists, kayakers,
      campers, and other aficionados of the outdoors are very careful to operate
      in environmentally friendly ways. Similarly, companies that operate in
      geographical regions that are very supportive of environmental protection
      may well publicize their use of green production methods and philosophies.
      The marketplace goodwill that can be realized in such situations should
      not be underestimated.
    

      Small business consultants, meanwhile, counsel their clients to carefully
      research the obligations that a commitment to green production entails
      before making any decision. Smaller businesses sometimes have difficulty
      securing the necessary financing to switch physical operations to a green
      production mode. Moreover, jumps in other operating costs as a result of
      changes to green production methods sometimes result in higher prices for
      customers, and subsequent drops in sales. While larger companies can
      usually shrug off such ripple effects with ease, smaller businesses are
      often less able to do so. But consultants acknowledge that green
      production methods can boost business as well, increasing sales while
      decreasing production costs. Indeed, proponents argue that for many small
      businesses—and especially new ventures, which do not have
      previously established modes of operation—green production can be a
      rewarding business philosophy.
    



      FURTHER READING:
    


        Green Products by Design: Choices for a Cleaner Environment
      
      . Office of Technology Assessment, 1992.
    

      Hart, Stuart L. "How Green Production Might Sustain the
      World." 
      
        Northwest Environmental Journal.
      
       1994.
    

      Poltorzycki, Stephen. 
      
        Creativing Environmental Business Value.
      
       Crisp, 1999.
    

      Shi, J. Stephen, and Jane M. Kane. "Green Issues." 
      
        Business Horizons.
      
       January-February 1996.
    

      Shrivastava, P., and Stuart Hart. "Greening Organizations." 
      
        Academy of Management Best Paper Proceedings.
      
       Vol. 52.1992.
    

      Stern, Alissa J., and Tim Hicks. 
      
        The Process of Business/ Environmental Collaborations: Partnering for
        Sustainability.
      
       Quorum Books, 2000.
    

      Willig, John, ed. 
      
        Auditing for Environmental Quality Leadership: Beyond Compliance to
        Environmental Excellence.
      
       Executive Enterprises, 1995.
    

      Zinkhan, George, and Les Carlson. "Green Advertising and the
      Reluctant Consumer." 
      
        Journal of Advertising.
      
       Summer 1995.
    










User Contributions:


Comment about this article, ask questions, or add new information about this topic:





Name:



E-mail:



Show my email publicly



Type the code shown:








Public Comment: (50-4000 characters)





 Send comment



 
Green Production forum




			Green Marketing
		

			Grievance Procedures
		 
















EQ-731L AKM Semiconductor Inc. | Sensors, Transducers | DigiKey










































































Taiwan

0080-185-4023


Change Country

English

TWD


 Your item(s) View Cart Login orREGISTER LoginRegisterWhy Register





All ProductsAll ContentAudio ProductsBattery ProductsBoxes Enclosures RacksCable AssembliesCables Wires ManagementCables WiresCapacitorsCircuit ProtectionComputers Office Components AccessoriesConnectors InterconnectsCrystals and OscillatorsDevelopment Boards, Kits, ProgrammersDiscrete Semiconductor ProductsEmbedded ComputersFans Thermal ManagementFiltersHardware Fasteners AccessoriesInductors Coils ChokesIndustrial Controls MetersIntegrated CircuitsIsolatersKitsLine Protection Distribution BackupsMagnetics Transformer Inductor ComponentsMaker/DIY, EducationalMemory Cards ModulesMotors Solenoids Driver Boards ModulesNetworking SolutionsOptical Inspection EquipmentOptoelectronics Potentiometers Variable ResistorsPower Supplies Board MountPower Supplies External Internal Off-BoardPrototyping ProductsRelaysResistorsRF IF and RFIDSensors TransducersSoldering Desoldering Rework ProductsStatic Control ESD Clean Room ProductsSwitchesTape AdhesivesTest and MeasurementToolsTransformers





PRODUCTS MANUFACTURERS RESOURCESResearchArticlesContent LibraryEngineering ResourcesIndustrial AutomationIoT Product SelectorNewest ProductsProduct Training ModulesSensors Product SelectorVideo LibraryDesignConversion CalculatorsDevelopment ToolsEDA & Design ToolsReference Designs Scheme-it® Design ToolTechZones℠Search / OrderingBOM ManagerBrowser ResourcesOnline CatalogOrder StatusShopping Cart 





Product Index > Sensors, Transducers  > Magnetic Sensors - Linear, Compass (ICs) > AKM Semiconductor Inc. EQ-731L
            



               Share 






Share this on:







Or copy the link below:



This feature is temporarily unavailable. We are working diligently to get this fixed. Thank you for your patience.











                    Add To Favorites
                


                            This feature is only available for registered users. Please Login or Register.
                        


This feature is temporarily unavailable. We are working diligently to get this fixed. Thank you for your patience.




 







 







                                Product Overview
                            


Digi-Key Part Number


                                        EQ-731L-ND
                                    


Quantity Available




1,859

Can ship immediately                



Manufacturer



AKM Semiconductor Inc.





Manufacturer Part Number



                                            EQ-731L
                                        



Description

                                            SENSOR LINEAR ANALOG 3SIP
                                        



                                            Lead Free Status / RoHS Status
                                        

                                            Lead free / RoHS Compliant
                                        


Moisture Sensitivity Level (MSL)
1  (Unlimited)


Manufacturer Standard Lead Time


                                                14 Weeks
                                            



Detailed Description


                                                Hall Effect Sensor Single Axis 3-SIP

                                            








                            Documents & Media
                        


Datasheets

EQ-731L







Design Resources

Development Tool Selector













                Product Attributes
            
Select All



Categories

Sensors, Transducers







Magnetic Sensors - Linear, Compass (ICs)






Manufacturer
AKM Semiconductor Inc.



Series

EQ





                        Packaging
 

Cut Tape (CT) 





                        Part Status
                    



Active

                        




                        Type
                    



Linear

                        




                        Technology
                    



Hall Effect

                        




                        Axis
                    



Single

                        




                        Output Type
                    



Analog Voltage

                        




                        Sensing Range
                    



-

                        




                        Voltage - Supply
                    



3 V ~ 5.5 V

                        




                        Current - Supply (Max)
                    



12mA

                        




                        Current - Output (Max)
                    



1.2mA

                        




                        Resolution
                    



-

                        




                        Bandwidth
                    



210kHz

                        




                        Operating Temperature
                    



-40°C ~ 100°C (TA)

                        




                        Features
                    



-

                        




                        Package / Case
                    



3-SIP

                        




                        Supplier Device Package
                    



3-SIP

                        




 



Report an Error



 You May Also Be Interested In 







A1366LKTTN-10-T

Allegro MicroSystems, LLC

SENSOR LINEAR ANALOG 4SIP
 Unit Price 
167.00000
                
620-1657-1-ND







SS49E

Honeywell Sensing and Productivity Solutions

SENSOR LINEAR ANALOG RADIAL
 Unit Price 
85.00000
                
480-2006-ND







A1363LKTTN-2-T

Allegro MicroSystems, LLC

SENSOR LINEAR ANALOG 4SIP
 Unit Price 
158.00000
                
620-1691-1-ND







SS495A

Honeywell Sensing and Productivity Solutions

SENSOR LINEAR ANALOG RADIAL
 Unit Price 
114.00000
                
480-2005-ND







A1324LUA-T

Allegro MicroSystems, LLC

SENSOR LINEAR ANALOG 3SIP
 Unit Price 
79.00000
                
620-1432-ND









                                                    Additional Resources
                                                


Standard Package 
 1



                                                                Other Names
                                                            

EQ-731LCT 
EQ-731LCT-ND 
EQ-731LTR 
EQ-731LTR-ND 
EQ731L 




08:45:17 8/1/2017




                                                    Price & Procurement
                                                

 






Quantity




 



EQ-731L-ND
EQ-731L ‎



















                                                        All prices are in TWD.
                                                    


Price Break
Unit Price
Extended Price


1

 77.00000
77.00


5
72.60000
363.00


10
62.20000
622.00


25
49.72000
1,243.00


50
45.60000
2,280.00


100
41.45000
4,145.00


500
36.26600
18,133.00


1,000
32.12200
32,122.00


5,000
30.04920
150,246.00



                                                            Submit a request for quotation on quantities greater than those displayed.







 Send Feedback












Information
Terms & ConditionsAbout Digi-KeyContact UsNewsroomSite MapSupported BrowsersPrivacy Statement

Taiwan
taiwan.support@digikey.com
Toll-Free: 0080-185-4023Fax: +852-3104-0686




International
AfricaAsiaAustraliaEuropeMiddle EastNorth AmericaSouth America




Copyright © 1995-2017, Digi-Key Electronics.All Rights Reserved.701 Brooks Avenue South,Thief River Falls, MN 56701 USA



















Eq-Inc













Home
Encyclopedia of Small Business
 Eq-Inc


		       Eq-Inc
		    
Equity Financing
Equity financing is a strategy for obtaining capital that involves selling a partial interest in the company to investors. The equity, or ownership position, that investors receive in exchange for their funds usually takes the form of stock in the company. 
Ergonomics
Ergonomics is the process of changing the work environment (equipment, furniture, pace of work, etc.) to fit the physical requirements and limitations of employees, rather than forcing workers to adapt to jobs that can, over time, have a debilitating effect on their physical well-being. Companies of all shapes and sizes have increasingly recognized that establishing an ergonomically sensitive work environment for employees can produce bottom-line benefits in cutting absenteeism, reducing health care costs, and increasing productivity. 
Estate Tax
Estate taxes are taxes due to the federal government upon the death of the owner of a business or estate. At first glance, IRS figures indicate that the tax has a far greater impact on wealthy individuals than on small business owners, but representatives of the latter group insist that it has long been a dreaded levy that packs a deceptive punch among small businesses. 
European Union (EU)
The European Union (EU), formerly known as the European Community (EC), was formed in the 1950s to encourage and oversee political and economic cooperation between numerous European nations. In the nearly half-century since it was formed, the EU has gradually succeeded in becoming the dominant governing economic body in Europe, and it now affects every aspect of business in its member states.
Expense Accounts
Expense accounts, also called expense allowances, are plans under which companies reimburse employees for business-related expenses. These expenses include travel, entertainment, gifts, and other expenses related to the employer's business activity. 
Export-Import Bank
The United States Export-Import (Ex-Im) Bank, originally established in 1945, is an independent agency that was created to help finance U.S. exports to industrializing and developing markets by providing loans, credit guarantees, and insurance. 
Exporting
Exporting is the practice of sending or carrying merchandise to a foreign country for trade or sale. International business is a potentially lucrative area for many businesses, but the small business owner should be aware that establishing oneself in a foreign market is a complex, time-consuming task. 
Exporting—Financing and Pricing
One of the most important elements in establishing a successful exporting business is understanding financing and pricing issues associated with international trade. Production costs and product pricing are profoundly interrelated aspects of any business venture; an enterprise has to fully understand its marketing, production, distribution, and other operating costs if it hopes to make an informed decision regarding pricing strategies for its product line. 
Facility Layout and Design
Facility layout and design is an important component of a business's overall operations, both in terms of maximizing the effectiveness of production processes and meeting employee needs and/or desires. Writing in Production and Operations Management, Howard J. 
Facility Management
In an article for Managing Office Technology, Kit Tuveson defined facility management as "the coordination of the physical workplace with the people and work of an organization. It integrates the principles of business administration, architecture, and the behavioral and engineering sciences." In the most basic terms, facility management encompasses all activities related to keeping a complex operating. 
Factoring
Factoring is a form of financing in which a business sells its receivables to a third party or "factor company" at a discounted price. Under this arrangement, the factor agrees to provide financing and other services to the selling business in return for interest and fees on the money that they advanced against receivables invoices. 
Family Limited Partnership
Family limited partnerships (sometimes known as FLPs) are an increasingly popular succession planning alternative utilized by owners of family businesses who want to pass the establishment on to their children without being hit by heavy federal taxes. Neil Alexander, writing in Best's Review, described the family limited partnership as "a legal agreement that allows business owners and their children to address several tax, business-succession, and estate-planning needs all at once. 
Family and Medical Leave Act
The Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) provides employees who qualify with up to 12 work weeks of unpaid, job-protected leave in a 12-month period for specified family and medical reasons. It also requires group health benefits to be maintained during the leave as if employees continued to work instead of taking leave. 
Family-Owned Businesses
A family-owned business is any business in which two or more family members are involved and the majority of ownership or control lies within a family. Family-owned businesses may be the oldest form of business organization, and today they are recognized as important and distinct participants in the world economy. 
Feasibility Study
A feasibility study is a detailed analysis of a company and its operations that is conducted in order to predict the results of a specific future course of action. Small business owners may find it helpful to conduct a feasibility study whenever they anticipate making an important strategic decision. 
Federal Trade Commission (FTC)
The Federal Trade Commission (FTC) was established as an independent administrative agency pursuant to the Federal Trade Commission Act of 1914. The purpose of the FTC is to enforce the provisions of the Federal Trade Commission Act, which prohibits "unfair or deceptive acts or practices in commerce." The Clayton Antitrust Act (1914) also granted the FTC the authority to act against specific and unfair monopolistic practices. 
Fica Taxes
Federal Insurance Contribution Act (FICA) taxes, which include contributions to federal Social Security and Medicare programs, must be paid by all American workers, whether they are employed by a company or are self-employed. Small businesses that employ persons other than the owner or partners are required to withhold FICA taxes—along with regular income taxes—from the wages paid to employees, remit these taxes to the Internal Revenue Service (IRS), and make regularly scheduled reports to the IRS about the amount of taxes owed and paid. 
Fiduciary Duty
Fiduciary duty is a legal requirement of loyalty and care that applies to any person or organization that has a fiduciary relationship with another person or organization. A fiduciary is a person, committee, or organization that has agreed to accept legal ownership or control and management of an asset or group of assets belonging to someone else. 
Finance Companies
Commercial finance companies have in recent years become a favorite option for entrepreneurs seeking small business loans. These institutions generally charge higher interest rates than banks and credit unions, but they also are more likely to approve a loan request. 
Finance and Financial Management
Finance and financial management encompass numerous business and governmental activities. In the most basic sense, the term finance can be used to describe the activities of a firm attempting to raise capital through the sale of stocks, bonds, or other promissory notes. 
Financial Analysis
Financial analysis is an aspect of the overall business finance function that involves examining historical data to gain information about the current and future financial health of a company. Financial analysis can be applied in a wide variety of situations to give business managers the information they need to make critical decisions. 
Financial Planners
A good financial planner will conduct an in-depth interview to gather information about the client's income, expenses, assets, liabilities, future goals, and risk tolerance. Then the planner will use this information to develop a detailed, written financial plan specifically for the client. 
Financial Ratios
Financial ratios illustrate relationships between different aspects of a small business's operations. They involve the comparison of elements from a balance sheet or income statement, and are crafted with particular points of focus in mind. 
Financial Statements
Financial statements are written records of business finances, including balance sheets and profit and loss statements. They stand as one of the most essential components of business information, and as the principal method of communicating financial information about an entity to outside parties. 
Firewalls
A firewall is a computer security device that is situated between a small business's internal network and the Internet. It can work at either the software or the hardware level to prevent unwanted outside access to the company's computer system. 
Fiscal Year
A fiscal year is any 52-week period used consistently by an organization for the purposes of financial reporting and policy setting. It may or may not correspond with the typical calendar year of January to December. 
Fixed and Variable Expenses
Fixed and variable expenses are the two main components of a company's total overhead expense. Fixed costs are those that do not fluctuate with changes in production activity level or sales volume, such as rent, insurance, dues and subscriptions, equipment leases, payments on loans, depreciation, management salaries, and advertising. 
Flexible Benefit Plans
Flexible benefit plans allow employees to choose the benefits they want or need from a package of programs offered by an employer. Flexible benefit plans may include health insurance, retirement benefits such as 401(k) plans, and reimbursement accounts that employees can use to pay for out-of-pocket health or dependent care expenses. 
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
A flexible spending account (FSA) is a tax-deferred savings account established by an employer to help employees meet certain medical and dependent-care expenses that are not covered under the employer's insurance plan. Established under Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code, FSAs were once known as medical Individual Retirement Accounts (IRAs). 
Flexible Work Arrangements
Flexible work programs are work arrangements wherein employees are given greater scheduling freedom in how they fulfill the obligations of their positions. The most commonplace of these programs is flextime, which gives workers far greater leeway in terms of the time when they begin and end work, provided they put in the total number of hours required by the employer. 
Flow Charts
A flow chart, or flow diagram, is a graphical representation of a process or system that details the sequencing of steps required to create output. A typical flow chart uses a set of basic symbols to represent various functions, and shows the sequence and interconnection of functions with lines and arrows. 
Focus Groups
A focus group is a marketing research tool in which a small group of people (typically eight to ten individuals) engages in a roundtable discussion of selected topics of interest in an informal setting. The focus group discussion is typically directed by a moderator who guides the discussion in order to obtain the group's opinions about or reactions to specific products or marketing-oriented issues, known as test concepts. 
Forecasting
Forecasting can be broadly considered as a method or a technique for estimating many future aspects of a business or other operation. Planning for the future is a critical aspect of managing any organization, and small business enterprises are no exception. 
Fortune 500
The term Fortune 500 refers to an annual listing by Fortune magazine of the top 500 public companies in the U.S., as ranked by sales, assets, earnings, and capitalization. This list ranks only public companies, or those which have issued securities through an offering and which are traded on the stock market. 
401(K) Plans
A 401(k) plan is a tax-deferred, defined-contribution retirement plan. The name comes from a section of the Internal Revenue Code that permits an employer to create a retirement plan to which employees may voluntarily contribute a portion of their compensation on a pre-tax basis. 
Franchising
Franchising is a kind of licensing arrangement wherein a business owner, known as the "franchisor," distributes or markets a trademarked product or service through affiliated dealers, who are known as "franchisees." While these franchisees own their establishments, terms of franchising agreements typically require them to share operational responsibilities with the franchisor.
Free-Lance Employment/Independent Contractors
Free-lance employees, also known as independent contractors, are individuals who work on their own, without a long-term contractual commitment to any one employer. A free-lance employee usually performs services or completes work assignments under short-term contracts with several employers, or clients, who have the right to control only the final result of the individual's work, rather than the specific means used to get the work done. 
Gender Discrimination
Gender discrimination, also known as sexual discrimination, is the practice of letting a person's sex unfairly become a factor when deciding who receives a job, promotion, or other employment benefit. It most often affects women who feel they have been unfairly discriminated against in favor of a man. 
Globalization
Globalization is the process by which the economies of countries around the world become increasingly integrated over time. This integration occurs as technological advances expedite the trade of goods and services, the flow of capital, and the migration of people across international borders. 
Goodwill
Goodwill is a type of intangible business asset. It is defined as the difference between the fair market value of a company's assets (less its liabilities) and the market price or asking price for the overall company. 
Government Procurement
Many small businesses maintain and increase their operations through reliance on local, state, and federal government contracts. While these businesses may also secure business through the offering of competitive bids on jobs offered by the private sector, small business owners should be aware of the differences in procuring work from the public and private sectors. 
Graphical User Interface
A graphical user interface (GUI, pronounced "gooey") is a computer environment that simplifies the user's interaction with the computer by representing programs, commands, files, and other options as visual elements, such as icons, pull-down menus, buttons, scroll bars, windows, and dialog boxes. By selecting one of these graphical elements, through either use of a mouse or a selection from a menu, the user can initiate different activities, such as starting a program or printing a document. 
Green Marketing
Environmentally-responsible or "green" marketing is a business practice that takes into account consumer concerns about promoting preservation and conservation of the natural environment. Green marketing campaigns highlight the superior environmental protection characteristics of a company's products and services, whether those benefits take the form of reduced waste in packaging, increased energy efficiency in product use, or decreased release of toxic emissions and other pollutants in production. 
Green Production
Green production is a business strategy that focuses on profitability through environmentally friendly operating processes. Proponents of this management philosophy contend that green production is a sensible course to follow not only because of the benefits that it bestows on the natural environment, but also because of its fundamental strategic soundness. 
Grievance Procedures
Grievance procedures are a means of dispute resolution that can be used to address complaints by employees against management or to settle disputes between a company and its suppliers, customers, or competitors. The best-known application of grievance procedures is as a formal process outlined in labor union contracts. 
Groupthink
Groupthink occurs when the pressure to conform within a group interferes with that group's analysis of a problem and causes poor group decision making. Individual creativity, uniqueness, and independent thinking are lost in the pursuit of group cohesiveness, as are the advantages that can sometimes be obtained by making a decision as a group—bringing different sources of ideas, knowledge, and experience together to solve a problem. 
Groupware
Groupware is a category of software designed to help groups work together by facilitating the exchange of information among group members who may or may not be located in the same office. Often, groupware users are collaborating on the same project, although groupware can be used to share a variety of information throughout an entire organization and can also be extended to clients, suppliers, and other users outside the organization. 
Health Insurance Options
Health insurance is a contractual agreement between an individual or group and an insurance provider through which the insurance provider agrees to pay for some or all of the health care costs incurred by the person or group in exchange for their regular payment of a sum known as a premium. In this way, the insurance company assumes the financial risk of reimbursing health care costs, but it is able to offset that risk by collecting premiums from a large number of people, many of whom will have very low medical expenses. 
Health Maintenance Organizations and Preferred Provider Organizations
Health Maintenance Organizations (HMOs) and Preferred Provider Organizations (PPOs) administer the most common types of managed care health insurance plans. Managed care plans typically arrange to provide medical services for members in exchange for subscription fees paid to the plan sponsor—usually an HMO or PPO. 
Health Promotion Programs
A health promotion program—sometimes known as a wellness program—is a type of employee benefit that encompasses the various efforts companies make to promote and maintain their employees' health. Examples of health promotion programs might include company-sponsored smoking cessation training, visits with a nutritionist to receive information about healthy cooking, discounted fitness center memberships, or free cholesterol testing.
High-Tech Business
High-technology businesses are those enterprises engaged in securing growth and revenue from industry sectors characterized by rapidly changing and advanced technology. In fact, advanced technology has come to be utilized in so many different industries that members of the business community now often regard it as its own unique industry subset, with applications across the spectrum of the world of commerce. 
Home Offices
A home office is a space within an individual's personal residence that is used for business purposes. It may be a corner of a spare bedroom equipped with nothing more than a desk. 
Home-Based Business
A home-based business is any enterprise for which the principal administrative and managerial activities take place within an individual's personal residence. People start home-based business ventures for a wide variety of reasons. 
Hoteling
Hoteling is a form of "alternative officing" which allows employees who travel on business or work flexible hours to reserve desk space at the employer's offices as needed, rather than maintaining a permanent work space there. This allows the employer to make more efficient use of office space and thus reduce costs. 
Html
Hypertext Markup Language (HTML) is an authoring tool that is used in creating Internet Web pages. It is the preferred tool for those who wish to make their Web page more accessible and userfriendly because it is able to accelerate downloading over the Internet, although its quickness comes at the expense of formatting control. 
Hubzone Empowerment Contracting Program
The HUBZone Empowerment Contracting Program is an initiative of the U.S. Small Business Administration (SBA) that gives preference in securing federal contracts to small businesses located in "historically underutilized business zones," or HUBZones. 
Human Resource Management
Human Resource Management (HRM) is the term used to describe formal systems devised for the management of people within an organization. These human resources responsibilities are generally divided into three major areas of management: staffing, employee compensation, and defining/designing work. 
Human Resource Management and the Law
The field of human resources management is greatly influenced and shaped by state and federal employment legislation. Indeed, regulations and laws govern all aspects of human resource management, including recruitment, placement, development, and compensation areas.
Human Resource Policies
Human resource policies are the formal rules and guidelines that businesses put in place to hire, train, assess, and reward the members of their work force. These policies, when organized and disseminated in an easily used form—such as an employee manual or large postings—can go far toward eliminating any misunderstandings between employees and employers about their rights and obligations in the business environment. 
Income Statements
An income statement presents the results of a company's operations for a given reporting period. Along with the balance sheet, the statement of cash flows, and the statement of changes in owners' equity, the income statement is one of the primary means of financial reporting. 
































EQ Plus INC. - Medical & industrial disposable latex & synthetic gloves; home health medical supplies; dental disposable supplies.













































Alibaba.com





                            Sourcing Solutions
                            




                            Services & Membership
                            




                            Help & Community
                            






















































EQ Plus INC.




United States






Contact Detail








The supplier supports Trade Assurance – A free service that protects your orders from payment to delivery.Supplier's Trade Assurance Limit:  US $Learn More















Add to My Favorites




































EQ Plus INC.








	    		Unverified members are users who have unverified or insufficient company information associated with their Alibaba.com account. 
	    	









How do I set this?









Home


Product Categories


Company Profile

Company Overview
Industrial Certification
Company Capability
Business Performance



Contacts








How do I set this?
















                            Company Introduction
            			






Mr. Sam Siew



Loading...





		Contact Supplier
	











                            Business Type:
                        


                            Location:
                        


                            Year Established:
                        


                            Total Annual Revenue:
                        


                            Main Products:
                        


                            Main Markets:
                        




                                                            Distributor/Wholesaler                                                    

                                                            Texas, United States                                                    

                                                            0                                                    

                                                            Below US$1 Million                                                    

                                                            Medical & industrial disposable latex & synthetic gloves; home he                                                    

                                                            North America                                                    




Learn more about us









How do I set this?









                            Main Products
            			










under pad







under pad







toothbrush









under pad







under pad







Disposable Nitrile Glove










How do I set this?







Email to this supplier







How do I set this?











EQ Plus INC.




United States






Contact Detail








The supplier supports Trade Assurance – A free service that protects your orders from payment to delivery.Supplier's Trade Assurance Limit:  US $Learn More








How do I set this?















How do I set this?









                            Product Categories
            			




Ungrouped

See All Categories








How do I set this?
























How do I set this?






  





 






 





















 





































IQ or EQ: Which One Is More Important?






















 





































































































































































































Menu









IQ or EQ: Which One Is More Important?








                    Share
                






                    Pin
                






                    Email
                

























 Psychology
 


Cognitive Psychology
 


Intelligence
 



	IQ or EQ: Which One Is More Important?
		


Traditional Intelligence vs. Emotional Intelligence		




By Kendra Cherry 



    	Updated May 27, 2017 
		












                    Share
                






                    Pin
                






                    Email
                







	    Print
	    











 

        Justin Lewis/Stone/Getty Images
    





More in Psychology



 Cognitive Psychology




 
Intelligence




Sensation and Perception




Memory Retrieval and Forgetting




Problem Solving and Creativity






 Basics




 Personality Development




 Developmental Psychology




 Behavioral Theories




 Psychosocial Theories




 History




 Personality Psychology




 Leadership




 Psychotherapy




 Neuroscience and Biological Psychology




 Branches




 Social Psychology




 For Students




 Glossary




 View All



 



What's more important in determining life success—book smarts or street smarts? This question gets at the heart of an important debate contrasting the relative importance of cognitive intelligence (IQ) and emotional intelligence (EQ). Proponents of the so-called 'book smarts' might suggest that it is our IQ that plays the critical role in determining how well people fair in life. Those who advocate for the importance of what might be called 'street smarts' would instead suggest that EQ is even more important.









 So which is it?Understanding the IQ vs. EQ DebateIn his 1996 book Emotional Intelligence, author and psychologist Daniel Goleman suggested that EQ (or emotional intelligence quotient) might actually be more important than IQ. Why? Some psychologists believe that standard measures of intelligence (i.e. IQ scores) are too narrow and do not encompass the full range of human intelligence.The psychologist Howard Gardner, for example, has suggested that intelligence is not simply a single general ability. Instead, he suggests that there are actually multiple intelligences and that people may have strengths in a number of these areas.Instead of focusing on a single, general intelligence, usually referred to as the g factor, some experts believe that the ability to understand and express emotions can play an equal if not even more important role in how people fare in life.What's the Difference Between IQ and EQ?How are IQ and EQ measured and tested?



 Let's start by defining the two terms in order to understand what they mean and how they differ. IQ, or intelligence quotient, is a number derived from a standardized intelligence test. On the original IQ tests, scores were calculated by dividing the individual's mental age by his or her chronological age and then multiplying that number by 100.









 So a child with a mental age of 15 and a chronological age of 10 would have an IQ of 150. Today, scores on most IQ tests are calculated by comparing the test taker's score to the scores of other people in the same age group.IQ represents abilities such as:Visual and spatial processingKnowledge of the worldFluid reasoningWorking memory and short-term memoryQuantitative reasoningEQ, on the other hand, is a measure of a person's level of emotional intelligence. This refers to a person's ability to perceive, control, evaluate, and express emotions. Researchers such as John Mayer and Peter Salovey as well as writers like Daniel Goleman have helped shine a light on emotional intelligence, making it a hot topic in areas ranging from business management to education.EQ is centered on abilities such as:Identifying emotionsEvaluating how others feelControlling one's own emotionsPerceiving how others feelUsing emotions to facilitate social communicationRelating to othersSince the 1990s, emotional intelligence has made the journey from a semi-obscure concept found in academic journals to a popularly recognized term. Today, you can buy toys that claim to help boost a child's emotional intelligence or enroll your kids in social and emotional learning (SEL) programs designed to teach emotional intelligence skills.









 In some schools in the United States, social and emotional learning is even a curriculum requirement.So Which One Is More Important?At one point in time, IQ was viewed as the primary determinant of success. People with high IQs were assumed to be destined for a life of accomplishment and achievement and researchers debated whether intelligence was the product of genes or the environment (the old nature versus nurture debate). However, some critics began to realize that not only was high intelligence no guarantee for success in life, it was also perhaps too narrow a concept to fully encompass the wide range of human abilities and knowledge.
IQ is still recognized as an important element of success, particularly when it comes to academic achievement. People with high IQs typically to do well in school, often earn more money, and tend to be healthier in general. But today experts recognize it is not the only determinate of life success. Instead, it is part of a complex array of influences that includes emotional intelligence among other things.The concept of emotional intelligence has had a strong impact in a number of areas, including the business world. Many companies now mandate emotional intelligence training and utilize EQ tests as part of the hiring process. Research has found that individuals with strong leadership potential also tend to be more emotionally intelligent, suggesting that a high EQ is an important quality for business leaders and managers to have.For example, one insurance company discovered that EQ could play a vital role in sales success. Sales agents who ranked lower on emotional intelligence abilities such as empathy, initiative, and self-confidence were found to sell policies with an average premium of $54,000. For comparison, those agents who ranked highly on measures of EQ sold policies worth an average of $114,000.Emotional abilities can also influence the choices that consumer make when confronted with buying decisions. Nobel-prize winning psychologist Daniel Kahneman has found that people would rather deal with a person that they trust and like rather than someone they do not, even if that means paying more for an inferior product.Can You Learn Emotional Intelligence?So you might be wondering if emotional intelligence is so important, can it be taught or strengthened? According to one meta-analysis that looked at the results of social and emotional learning programs, the answer to that question is an unequivocal yes. The study found that approximately 50 percent of kids enrolled in SEL programs had better achievement scores and almost 40 percent showed improved grade-point-averages. These programs were also linked to lowered suspension rates, increased school attendance, and reduced disciplinary problems.Some strategies for teaching emotional intelligence include offering character education, modeling positive behaviors, encouraging people to think about how others are feeling, and finding ways to be more empathetic toward others.A Word From VerywellLife success is a result of many factors. Both IQ and EQ undoubtedly play roles in influencing your overall success, as well as things such as health, wellness, and happiness. Rather than focusing on which factors might have a more dominant influence, the greatest benefit may lie in learning to improve skills in multiple areas.In addition to strengthening certain cognitive abilities such as your memory and mental focus, you can also acquire new social and emotional skills that will serve you well in many different areas of your life.Sources:Goleman, D. Emotional Intelligence: Why It Can Matter More Than IQ. New York: Random House; 2012.Goleman, D. Working With Emotional Intelligence. New York: Random House; 2011.




















Show Full Article


 




Up Next


Up Next


Article
Alfred Binet & the History of IQ Testing





Up Next


Article
How Are Scores on IQ Tests Calculated, Anyway?





Up Next


Article
What's an IQ? Questions About IQ Testing





Up Next


List
5 Key Components of Emotional Intelligence











Continue Reading





 

Article
Is Your IQ Score Above Average?







 

Article
Does Having a High IQ Lead to Success in Life?







 

Article
What Are the Different Theories of Intelligence?







 

Article
Do You Have a Genius IQ Score?







 

Article
How Does Your Child IQ Affect His Abilities and Accommodations?







 

Article
What Great Psychologists Say About Emotional Intelligence







 

Video
Don't Worry, the IQ Test Is Not the Best Measure of You







 

Article
What Is General Intelligence? Review Your Psychology Terms







 

Article
Genes and Environment: What Factors Determine Intelligence?







 

Article
8 Strategies for Increasing Emotional Intelligence







 

Article
Parents' Guide To IQ Testing and Gifted Education







 

Article
What Do Those IQ Scores Mean?







 

Article
What Exactly Is Intelligence?







 

Article
How Howard Gardner Developed the Theory of Multiple Intelligences







 

List
These Psychology Quizzes Can Help You Study or Learn More About Yourself







 

Article
What Is the Bayley Scales Test for Infant and Toddler Development?






















 







The 1 Thing More Important than IQ and EQ | Inc.com
































































































































































You're about to be redirectedWe notice you're visiting us from a region where we have a local version of Inc.com.READ THIS ARTICLE ON or remain on inc.com






















Startup 







Best Industries


Funding


Incubators


Business Plans


Naming


Home-Based Business


The UPS StoreView




Grow 







MB Vans


Strategy


Operations


Sales


Marketing


Customer Service


Franchises


Build




Lead 







Company Culture


Productivity


Public Speaking


Hiring


HR/Benefits


Women Entrepreneurs


Rising Stars


T-MobileView




Innovate 







Creativity


Invent


Design


Pivot




Technology 







Cloud Computing


Social Media


Security


Big Data




Money 







Bootstrapping


Crowdfunding


Venture Capital


Borrowing


Business Models


Personal Finance




Inc. 5000 







The 2016 US List


The 2017 Europe List


Apply Inc. 5000 US




Special Reports 







Notes to My Younger Self


Disruptive 25


Best Workplaces


Icons of Entrepreneurship


Best Industries


30 Under 30


Extreme Entrepreneurship


Main Street


World's Coolest Offices


College Startups


Founders 10


Design Awards




Video 







Tip Sheet


The Playbook


Founders Forum


Peak Performance


Women Who Lead


Notes to My Younger Self


World's Coolest Offices


How I Did It


Lift


Inc. Tested


Drinks With…


GrowCo 2017


Origin Stories


Inc. Live




Events 







Full Schedule


Inc. Women's Summit


Inc.5000 Conference & Gala


Iconic


GrowCo Conference




Inc. BrandView 

NEWSLETTERS 

MAGAZINE 

PARTNER CONTENT 







Inc. BrandView


Inc. Branded Content


Inc. Franchise




PODCASTS 

SUBSCRIBE 

ADVERTISE 

INC. RADIO 

INC. BUSINESS HUB 







Inc. Verified Profile


Inc. Plus


Send Press Releases


Plan for your business


Secure Funding


Get Published




OTHER EDITIONS 







Inc. ASEAN


Inc. Arabia




SITEMAP 

PRIVACY 

PRESS QUERIES 

AD CHOICE 






 





































 Search


Newsletters


Follow


Subscribe








































Today's Must Reads






Inc. Events & Offers





Inc. Partner Events & Offers




























Forgot Password?




 Enter your email to reset your password











Or sign up using: 




































New member? Sign up now.
Sign in if you're already registered.


 
 
































Get Inc. Straight to Your Inbox
SIGN UP FOR TODAY'S 5 MUST READS


Sign Me Up


































													  PEOPLE
													







The 1 Thing More Important than IQ and EQ


Your intellectual and emotional potential are the result of your DNA.  What's important is what you do with whatever you've got.






 By Geoffrey James


Geoffrey James, a contributing editor for Inc.com, is an author and professional speaker whose award-winning blog, Sales Source, appears daily on Inc.com. His most recent book is Business Without the Bullsh*t: 49 Secrets and Shortcuts You Need to Know. To get your sales message critiqued for free, subscribe to his free weekly Sales Source newsletter.
@Sales_Source 


Contributing editor, Inc.com@Sales_Source 










2 COMMENTS
























CREDIT: Getty Images










I recently posted an infographic that provided a view of "personality traits" versus "intelligence levels" as indicators of success.  I decided to let it stand on its own because I believe it does have some value.
However, the infographic also contains some seriously fuzzy thinking that might lead readers astray. Therefore, I'm using this post to pull the infographic apart and to see where it falls badly short.
The infographic has three sections: 1) a premise, 2) a list and 3) a conclusion, so for clarity's sake I'll address each of these elements separately.
Intelligence Versus Personality
The setup for the infographic states that some "personality factors" are more important than "intelligent level. " But what does this mean, exactly?
Does "intelligent levels" mean IQ (Intelligence Quotient) or does it mean level of intellectual skill gained over time?
This is an important distinction.  IQ measures potential not performance. Relevant intellectual skill, by contrast, is crucial to many jobs.
For example, an employee with an IQ of 160 who's skilled in literary criticism is less likely to be useful than an employee with an IQ of 120 who's mastered object-oriented programming.
This is true even if both employees are autistic or even if the employee with the higher IQ is charismatic and the employee with the lower IQ is a dullard. Skills matter.
The premise then quotes a psychologist's list of the "personality factors" more valuable than "intelligence levels."  While make sense, the fifth "extraversion" is absurd.
As I've pointed out previously, extraverts are at a disadvantage in a business world where most of the interaction takes place online.
The only place where extraversion is an advantage are in open offices, which are designed to promote social interaction while reducing actual productivity.
The premise then quotes a study showing that 85% financial success is generated from "people skills" while 15% is from "technical knowledge."  What does that mean, exactly?
A person with zero technical knowledge has little hope of becoming successful, while many entrepreneurs--Bill Gates comes to mind--are definitely not "people-people."
The premise ends with a summary: "Intelligence, it seems, can only take you so far. Hard work and social skill development are the keys to reaching the top."This sudden appearance of "hard work" is odd, because it's the first indication that effort might be required.  I'll have more to say about this later.
The 8 Personality Traits
I agree that all eight of these traits are important.  However, the trait of "Passion" is a bit misleading and even a bet dangerous in practice.
A common business mistake is to wrongly believe that passion is contagious: that expressing your passion for your job, company or product will make other people passionate about it, too.
In fact, your personal enthusiasm is irrelevant to other people, except insofar as the lack of it might indicate incompetence.
In fact, gushing about your passion can come off glad-handing and even make you seem untrustworthy, especially if it's not backed by competence and intellectual skill.
The overall problem here, though, is that these "traits" continually blur the concept of potential versus actualization.  
For example, any parent of multiple children knows that some children are better than others at keeping their temper (i.e. self-regulation.")   Nevertheless, unless a child is seriously impaired, any child can learn to stop throwing tantrums.
Another problem is the catch-all "social skills."  By definition, skills aren't traits; they're something that's learned.  Some people find social interaction easy; others find it more difficult.  Such skills build on potential but they aren't the same thing as potential.
The final statement of this this section that the possession of social skills "ultimately means success," is completely absurd. There are plenty of failures who have great social skills.  (The TV show Better Call Saul, for instance, is a excellent character study of such a person.) 
For some jobs, indeed many jobs, developing requisite intellectual skills are as important or more important than social skills.  Empty suits can only rise so far; after a while people want to see some brains behind the fancy talk.
The Conclusion
The final segment of the infographic brings it's limitations to the forefront by stating that "intelligence" can't be taught but "personality traits" can be developed and enhanced.  
But that's ridiculous.  Of course, intelligence can be taught; that why we attend school, read books, and so forth.  What can't be altered is IQ but that's potential, not actualization.
What can't be taught is "personality traits" which is EQ, which measures potential rather than actualization.  Just as some people have a high IQ, some people have a higher EQ and therefore find people skills easier.
What's important isn't so much your IQ or your EQ, but what you decide to do with whatever potential you've got.  Thomas Edison put it perfectly when he said: "Success is 10 percent inspiration and 90 percent perspiration."


Like this column? Sign up to subscribe to email alerts and you'll never miss a post. The opinions expressed here by Inc.com columnists are their own, not those of Inc.com.



Published on: Feb 16, 2016



























































































 




























Eq Health Products Inc., 373 Route 46 West Bldg E Suite 150 Fairfield Nj 07004 Usa | Buyer Report — Panjiva





 













磐聚网

菜单 





磐聚网


解决方案

采购商
供应商
物流公司
政府机关
数据分析



产品

台
企业版
定制服务



数据

美国贸易数据
墨西哥贸易数据
巴西贸易数据
中 & 南美洲数据
中国贸易数据
趋势分析工具
磐聚网调研


价格详情
搜索

中文


English 

Español 







 在线演示 申请在线演示 

+86-21-6196-2555


登录 











Eq Health Products Inc.
磐聚网制作的企业页面 
 企业页面  采购商公司 美国







       查看 Eq Health Products Inc.'s 公司的产品及供应商 
成千上万家像您这样的公司使用磐聚网搜索供应商和竞争对手。


Request a Demo

        1 min video
      






轻松使用贸易数据
 

以公司为组织的美国海关记录
57适用于美国的出货量Eq Health Products Inc.自2007年起每周更新一次




日期
客户
供应商
详细信息

          41          more fields
        


2012-10-19

查看全部 57 货运记录 Eq Health Products Inc. 选择磐聚网数据套餐方案.申请演示或注册
 

2012-07-25


2012-07-21
Eq Health Products Inc.
Ningbo Green Health Pharmaceutical
Chondroitin Sulfate
货运提单


货运数据显示一个公司交易什么产品或者更多。
      了解更多信息 



快速地分析贸易关系




采购业务链
探索隐藏在美国进口数据的贸易关系。
查看全部 11 的供应商 Eq Health Products Inc.
 详细了解采购业务链 




顶级供应商


Nanjing Sunshine Trading In... 






注册并访问 







注册并访问 







注册并访问 







注册并访问 






 11 可查看到的供应商 


顶级产品


pumpkin seed oil 





tree flower bud extract 





pagoda tree flower bud 





flower bud extract 





tree flower bud 





 20出口最多的产品 






联系信息Eq Health Products Inc.



 
 地址373 Route 46 West Bldg E Suite 150 Fairfield Nj 07004 Usa 
 


 




           


    


Sample Bill of Lading

57 shipment records available



Date
2012-10-19


Shipper Name
Jilin Baili Biotechnology Co.,Ltd


Shipper Address
NO 918 YIYIROAD,KUANCHENG DISTRICT,, CHANGCHUN CN


Consignee Name
Eq Health Products Inc


Consignee Address
373 RT 46 WEST,BLDG E,SUITE 150,, FAIRFIELD, NJ 07004 US


Notify Party Name
Eq Health Products Inc


Notify Party Address
373 RT 46 WEST,BLDG E,SUITE 150,, FAIRFIELD, NJ 07004 US


Weight
8578


Weight Unit
KG


Weight in KG
8578.0


Quantity
43


Quantity Unit
PKG


Measure
13


Measure Unit
CM


Country of Origin
China


Details
8,578.0 kgFrom port: Busan, South KoreaTo port: Salem, MassachusettsVia port: New York, New York


Place of Receipt
Dalian


Foreign Port of Lading
Busan, South Korea


U.S. Port of Unlading
New York, New York


U.S. Destination Port
Salem, Massachusetts


Commodity
Pumpkin Seed Oil


Container
KKFU7174018


Carrier Name
SHIPCO TRANSPORT INC


Vessel Name
HANJIN SHANGHAI


Voyage Number
0124E


Bill of Lading Number
SHPTNYC9067820


Master Bill of Lading Number
KKLUDL1910386







 



类似产品的采购商  
chondroitin sulfate buyers
seed oil buyers




类似产品的供应商
chondroitin sulfate manufacturers
seed oil manufacturers




类似的采购商 Eq Health Products Inc. 

Hellena Fashion USA, Inc.
Cbl Tradings, Llc







成千上万的公司使用磐聚网研究供应商和竞争对手

申请在线演示











解决方案
采购商
供应商
物流公司
政府机关
数据分析




产品
台
企业版
定制服务




数据
美国
墨西哥
巴西
中、南美州
中国
磐聚网调研
合作伙伴




公司名
领导团队
董事会
博客
媒体评论
联系方式
职位



                20 West 22nd Street, Suite 706New York, NY, 10010 / USA上海市徐汇区肇嘉浜路1065号1609D单元                ‌
Request a demo











English 

Español 

中文







使用条款
隐私条款
网站地图





2017年©Panjiva公司







Cart (0) 
Continue Browsing

 






 











Eq Health Product Inc in Fairfield, NJ (Import & export history)
































 












Plans




Limited




Plus




Premium








            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 3-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 3-months from the current date.




            PlusSmall & Medium Business



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 12-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 12-months from the current date.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies




            Premium            Empire Builder



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
You'll have access to our entire database of shipping manifests of U.S. Ocean freight imports going back to November 2006.
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies





            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
Our Limited Plan lets you monitor the shipping activities of any three companies across all our databases. Be the first to know when your target company clears a shipment through customs in one of the countries we track.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plans, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            LimitedMonitor Your Competitors



Usage

10 Company Searches Per Day
10 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan which allows more searches.
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 3 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 1k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 3 Company Searches
If you need to track more than 3 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Plus or Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Usage

25 Searches Per Day
25 searches per day may be enough if you are just monitoring a few competitors or researching suppliers in a single industry. If you're looking to connect with sales leads or do more in-depth research, you should upgrade to the Premium plan which allows more searches.
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 25 companies in our database each month.
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more downloads.
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches
If you need to track more than 5 companies, product segments, or trade lanes, you should upgrade to the Premium plan, which allow more email alerts.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Usage

50 Searches Per Day
 
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Our team of account managers and research assistants will help you find contact information for up to 50 companies in our database each month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
If you're planning to do more in-depth research on the companies in our database, contact the Sales Department to purchase more credits and export additional shipping records.
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches





             Plus             Small & Medium Business



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Premium            Empire Builder



Features

Visual Mapping
Our Visual Mapping technology provides an instant snapshot of any company's trade connections. Navigate the global web of trading partners with the click of a mouse and visualize the relationships between companies many degrees apart.







            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Plus            Small & Medium Business



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.




            Premium            Empire Builder



Support

Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Call or e-mail our Customer Service Agents. They will get back to as soon as possible to assist you with your data needs.
Dedicated Research Assistant
An experienced trade data specialist will serve as your dedicated account manager to locate hard-to-reach data, perform searches and compile reports on your behalf.




            Limited            Monitor Your Competitors



Data

Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
You'll have access to data from the previous 6-months from the date of your search. We use a rolling date range, so you can always look back 6 months from the current date.







X












                   Home                





                        How It Works                    



                            U.S. Data                        

                            Additional Countries                        

                            Our Datasets                        

                            Our Clients                        

                            IG Reviews                        

                            Videos                        

                            Pictures                        

                            Presentation                        



                   Plans & Pricing                

                    Search                

                  Contact Us                
Live Chat				

                    Free Demo                

                    Sign In                

                    Join Now                











English
中文
French










English



中文



French



 

Get global shipment alerts for Eq Health Product Inc, $9.95 /month

Processing, please wait ...







Cardholder's Name


Tell us your Full Name



Credit Card No. 








Enter a valid Card No.



Exp. Date

1 January
2 February
3 March
4 April
5 May
6 June
7 July
8 August
9 September
10 October
11 November
12 December




2017
2018
2019
2020
2021
2022
2023
2024
2025
2026



Postal Code / Zip


(or Postal Code if not in the USA)




  Terms of Service




Submit















			                                                Service: 855-573-9976 
                        Sales: +1-855-573-9976

 Live Chat

Choose Language
 English
 中文
 French




 



Hi, may I help you with something?

An ImportGenius.com sales agent is available to answer your question.


							Chat Live Now						

						No, thanks.					







Sign Up






Home
How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Search
Contact Us


Live Chat

2
  



 



Eq Health Product Inc

Eq-health Product Inc imports from Guangzhou Juyuan Bio-chem Co.,ltd in Hong Kong through the port of New York, New York        





 Call +1 (480) 744 2559




Import Genius






                                Our bill of lading data reveals the trading activities of Eq Health Product Inc and millions of other importers.                            


Learn More
Join Now




Request a Demo





Would you like to schedule a free demo?
We'd love to show you international trade data relevant to your own business.










Name




Email





Phone






Schedule A Free Demo


















Play muted


International Trade Starts With Our Data









Other companies in our database

 NINTENDO OF AMERICA INC.
 NISSAN MOTOR IBERICA SA
 HOT TOPIC MERCHANDISE INC.
 TOSHIBA ELECTROMEX.S.A. DE C.V.    
 DELL PRODUCTS
















View Sample Shipment Records
Shipment Alert Subscription
Contact This Company



Sign Up

 





Sample shipment record for Eq Health Product Inc
Eq-health Product Inc imports from Guangzhou Juyuan Bio-chem Co.,ltd in Hong Kong through the port of New York, New York


                                Bill of Lading                            





Manufacturer / Shipper
Consignee



GUANGZHOU JUYUAN BIO-CHEM CO.,LTD
5FL.,NO.10 YAYINGSHI RD.,SCIENCE   
CITY,LUOGANG DISTRICT,GUANGZHOU,   
CHINA


EQ-HEALTH PRODUCT INC
373 RT 46 WEST,BLDG E,SUITE 150    
FAIRFIELD,NJ 07004,USA



Notify Party
Marks and Numbers



EQ-HEALTH PRODUCT INC.




EQ-HEALTH 
PRODUCT INC. 
NEW YORK,USA 
LYCOPENE 10%FS 
LOT NO.: 
LP1202A0107 10 
C/NO.:1-25/25 
PALLET:1/1
EQ-HEALTH 
PRODUCT INC. 
NEW YORK,USA 
LYCOPENE 10%FS 
LOT NO.: 
LP1202A0107 10 
C/NO.:1-25/25 
PALLET:1/1





Master Bill of Lading Number
Container Number



HDMUGJNW9977634


TCLU4192698
TCLU4192698


Product Description




LYCOPENE 10%FS
LYCOPENE 10%FS









Bill of LadingUCMISCL1200432  Arrival Date2012-04-07Weight (LB)1,157Weight (KG)526UnitsCMQuantity25 CTNContainer Count1CBM2Voyage No.027EPort of LoadingHONG KONGPort of DischargeNEW YORK, NEW YORKVessel NameHYUNDAI VOYAGERCarrier CodeUCMICountry Of OriginHong KongPlace Of ReceiptHUANGPU,CHINA 





Subscribe to access the complete shipping history for Eq Health Product Inc. Join Now 







How will your business use our trade data?
If you're involved in international trade, our database of shipping manifests will help you find opportunities to grow your business.

Find Trading Partners You Can Trust
Monitor Competitors' Shipping Activities
Connect With Sales Prospects














                            "Very informative and great site and so quick. Pretty slick."
                        







Betty Fatzie

                                                                    President,                                 
                                                                    Lab Products, Inc.                                
                            






                            "The service was great, with a reasonable price and great results. We have now started using another supplier from China. We just ordered our first container from the new supplier and with the savings it more than paid for the ImportGenius.com service on the first container load."
                        







Cleve Kurz

                                
                                                                    Gifford Monument Works                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is not merely an investment for our organization, it’s a vital instrument to effectively manage our time. It has afforded us the ability to quickly segment, target and position ourselves in front of prospective clients. Thank you, Import Genius!"
                        







David Bryant

                                                                    Director of Business Development,                                 
                                                                    John S. James Co.                                
                            






                            "Import Genius data is fantastic for evaluating component manufacturers in China."
                        







Sanjay Dastoor

                                
                                                                    BoostedBoards.com                                
                            






                            "We have confidence that we're working with the best manufacturers in part because Import Genius showed us that they already supply some of the world's top brands"
                        







Yaniv Masjedi

                                                                    Vice President,                                 
                                                                    Nextiva.com                                
                            






                            "Import Genius is a highly informative tool for monitoring public companies' operating activities. It is an invaluable part of our research."
                        







Eric DeLamarter

                                                                    Managing Partner,                                 
                                                                    Half Moon Capital                                
                            






                            "We find new clients for our customs brokerage in the ImportGenius database almost every day"
                        







Jayson Gispan

                                                                    Customs Brokerage Operations Manager,                                 
                                                                    Flexport.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius is a great research tool. We use it to evaluate manufacturers to make sure we are working with only the highest quality, most reliable suppliers"
                        







Chris Friedland

                                                                    Founder / CEO,                                 
                                                                    Build.com                                
                            






                            "ImportGenius gave us visibility into the actual shipping histories of the manufacturers we were evaluating and helped us feel comfortable we were working with the best suppliers in China."
                        







Morena Simitic

                                                                    COO,                                 
                                                                    BellaBeat.com                                
                            
























Shipment Alert Subscription



                        Get e-mail alerts when Eq Health Product Inc has new shipments.                        

Processing, please wait ...









Submit












Contact Eq Health Product Inc







 



Name



Business



Email



Phone




Submit




Processing, please wait ...

 

 





Features



Save and Share Reports
Easily get your searches out of Import Genius and into your team’s hands for further analysis. Export your findings to XLS or CSV, or send reports via email. It’s the simple things that make our trade data even more valuable to you.



See the Supply Chain
Visual Mapping shows you exactly how your target companies and their trading partners connect. Search by shipper and see everyone they’ve shipped to. Or search by consignee and see all their suppliers. Zoom in on any company to see their own trading network. Dive deep into international trade and discover the links in anyone’s supply chain.



Get Real-time Shipment Alerts
Stay on top of your competitors, suppliers, and customers with real-time alerts. Just set up a search and get an email whenever a new shipment matches your terms. Import Genius lets you know the moment they bring in a rival product or start shipping to a new partner.








Eq Health Product Inc
You've viewed 20 profile pages on Import Genius, which is the most we allow for free. Sign up for ImportGenius to get more details on over 3 million importers and exporters. It only takes seconds.






Sign Up for Import Genius! 








Plans




Limited
Monitor Your Competitors




Recommended Plan
Plus
Small & Medium Business




Premium
Empire Builder






Price





$
99
594
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
199
1,194
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    






$
399
2,394
/month
for 6 months



                        Sign Up                    







Data




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 3 months for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from the last 12 months for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details




Access data on U.S. ocean freight imports from November 2006 to the present for all companies
U.S. ocean freight exports from January 1, 2014 to present for all companies
View Details






Usage





Track the shipping activities of your 3 chosen companies
3 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 5k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 3 Searches

View Details





25 Searches Per Day
25 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 10k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 5 Searches

View Details





50 Searches Per Day
50 Contact Info Requests Per Month
Download (CSV and XLS) 25k Records Per Month
Email Alerts for up to 10 Searches

View Details






Features


 


Visual Mapping
View Details




Visual Mapping
View Details






Support




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details




Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
View Details





Our Customer Service Agents are available when you need them. Call in to receive helpful tips and training.
Dedicated Research Assistant

View Details






  






View All U.S. Imports
Instantly search 109,970,574 ocean freight records to monitor U.S. importers, research suppliers, generate sales leads and more.


As Featured In





















What is Import Genius





Who Uses Import Genius





Available Data Fields







What is Import Genius


												Import Genius reveals the trading activities of importers and exporters around the world.								

												We give you hard data about your overseas suppliers and domestic competitors. Using shipping databases from Customs agencies in the United States, Latin America, and India, Import Genius can help you find reliable new trading partners, monitor your competitors’ shipments, and keep an eye on your current suppliers and customers.								

												Our team of seasoned import-export veterans, cutting-edge software developers, and customer service professionals has worked for years to build the world's most powerful and accessible database of international trade intelligence.								



												We do this for a diverse client base that requires keen insight into international trade.								

												Our customers include some of the world's top importers, exporters, freight forwarders, logistics companies, manufacturers, investment banks, financial analysts, intellectual property attorneys, and more. They use our tools to:								

Research the trade activity of importers and suppliers
Identify and vet new sources for any kind of product
Monitor the competition and their trade connections
Generate sales leads for transportation and logistics companies
Track the activity of publicly-traded companies
Investigate and enforce intellectual property infringement
Ensure exclusive agent compliance




Who Uses Import Genius

Sourcing Professionals...

			Use our service to view shipping histories for suppliers.		

			We provide access to detailed customs records, letting you verify suppliers' true shipping volumes and U.S. customer lists. You can also look up your competing import firms to find where they buy their goods.		
+ Learn More
Competitive Intelligence Analysts...

			Use our service to learn where rivals source products.		

			We give clear insights into the importing volumes, new product releases, and broader competitive dynamics of your industry.		
+ Learn More


Sales & Marketing Teams...

			Use our service to generate sales prospects.		

			We give you the tools to target importers based on product type, location, shipping volumes, and more.		
+ Learn More
Financial Analysts...

			Use our service to monitor public companies' imports.		

			We offer rare data on the success or failure of new product launches, shipping trends and other operating data for companies in any industry.		
+ Learn More



Available Data Fields

Import Genius Data Fields

												By collecting the ocean freight bill of lading for all U.S. imports in our database, Import Genius provides unprecedented access to near real-time information on virtually every industry and company importing goods into the country.								

												For each shipment entering the U.S. by ocean, we provide access to the following information.								
Additional Fields Available for Some Shipments:

Phone Number
Fax Number
Email
Contact Person



List of Data Fields



ConsigneeThe company importing the shipment into the U.S.Consignee AddressThe address of the company importing the shipment into the U.S.ShipperThe overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Shipper AddressThe address of the overseas company exporting the shipment to the U.S.Product DescriptionThe exporter's description of the shipment as it appears on the bill of lading or shipping manifestGross WeightThe gross weight of the shipment, excluding the weight of the actual container. This can appear in either pounds or kilograms at the discretion of the exporterNumber Of UnitsThe quantity of boxes customs would find if they were to open the shipment for inspection.VolumeThe volume of the shipment, generally defined in cubic meters or container base measurements (CBM)Arrival DateThe date the shipment arrives within the customs territory of the U.S.Foreign PortThe last port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.Country Of OriginThe country of the last foreign port the shipment passes through before arriving in the U.S.U.S. PortThe U.S. port where the shipment enters the customs territory of the U.S.Carrier CodeThe four digit Standard Carrier Alpha Code of the ocean carrier or freight forwarder managing the transit of the shipmentVoyage NumberA unique code assigned to that particular sailing of the ship between two portsVessel NameThe name of the ship transporting the shipmentShip Registered InThe country where the ship is officially registeredBill Of Lading NumberThe unique number assigned to this particular shipment by the ocean carrier or freight forwarderContainer NumberThe unique number assigned to the ocean shipping container carrying the shipment in questionMarks & NumbersAny text or numbers appearing on the cartons 

















Import Genius

How It Works
Plans & Pricing
Our Trade Data Blog
Search
Latin Trade Data

Import Genius Reviews & Press Coverage
Who Uses Import Genius
Contact Us



Latest Posts




                                    Trump Properties Have…                                




                                    India, US palm oil imports…                                




                                    Chilean salmon exports…                                




                                    Limited Plan Now Available                                




                                    Solar panels: imports…                                




Company Profiles



                                    Honsea Sunshine Biotech C                                



                                    Ignite Usa Llc C/o Tagg Reno Wareho                                



                                    Mas Solar Inc                                



                                    Mountain Waffle Co Llc                                



                                    Panyang Tianjie Hardware Trade Co.,                                











                     
                                            109,970,574  Records in our database and counting





Customer Support Team: 

                    Tel:  855-573-9976
                    International: +1 480-745-3396
                    Fax: +1 602-428-9400
info@importgenius.com

                    8901 E Pima Center Pkwy, 
		    Suite 105 
                    Scottsdale, AZ 85258


Shanghai, China:

                    Tel: +86-21-63806036


                    Mobile No.: +86-13671737628
                    Fax Number: +86-21-63806036


Shenzhen, China
                    
                            Tel: +86-755-89517585
                            Mob: +86-13925258002
                            Fax: +86-755-89517585                



Have questions? We'll reply quickly!





									         		Type your info below								         		











Message



Submit

Processing, please wait ...

 

 

                Trainings, Demos, and General Contact All Available            
Or Call Us:
Service:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Sales:

                    +1-855-573-9976                
Back to top

 





All Rights Reserved. Copyright © 2017. Trade Data Services, Inc. 0.2847
 






 

 




We're Offline
Please leave us a message



To chat with a representative of Import Genius, your browser needs to be Internet Explorer 9 or higher. Please fill out the form below and a representative will contact you as soon as possible.



Name



Email



Phone



Message



Send




X




















親子教養課程 | 笛飛兒EQ教育






















































































 






















Home/親子教養課程 








			親子教養課程		


eqedu 


			2017-06-28T10:57:54+00:00		



親子教養課程




父母團體課程 & 一對一諮詢
更多 家長團體課程 資訊



親子教育講座
更多 親子教育講座 資訊







你是否在教養的路上感到有些困頓、有些孤寂呢？
近幾年來，有越來越多家長看著孩子在遊戲當中不斷進步，也期待著自己可以學習更多與孩子相處的方式，共同朝「教養好舒服」的目標邁進。
面對眾多的兒童教養策略文章和兒童教養書籍，你發現自己很需要有人可以討論、甚至是諮詢。 如果你曾經與媽媽朋友們討論某個教養議題，卻發現怎麼理還是無法找到正確的方向，實在摸不透現在的孩子腦袋裡到底在裝什麼？！
心理ＯＳ：好想把小暴民們抓起來搖晃一下
日本管理大師大前研一曾在《思考的技術》一書中提及： 「大多數人在面對問題時，並沒有認真思考，而是單純地把『一時的想法』稱為解決對策，好像都不知道為了解決問題該怎麼想、該用什麼方法想。」
運用水平思考，去激發我們原本對於的一個問題點進行多元觀點的探討，以及探詢任何一個可能的方案，增加思考問題的彈性，也可進而促發我們對孩子變化的臨機應變力！
如何讓討論更有效、更聚焦？ 讓討論不是只有單純婆婆媽媽間的經驗分享，還有科學的邏輯推演、專業的分析
那你可能會需要尋求專家的協助囉！直接打包教養專家的專屬建議，能讓爸爸媽媽在教養上更加能心應手！










 
 

 
 
 













為什麼推展兒童EQ教育 | 笛飛兒EQ教育























































































 






















Home/關於笛飛兒/為什麼推展兒童EQ教育 








			為什麼推展兒童EQ教育		


eqedu 


			2017-06-28T10:57:54+00:00		



為什麼推展兒童EQ教育




情緒決定心境，心境決定心態，心態造就態度，
態度形成習慣，習慣累積成個性，個性造就命運。
您認同以上這些話嗎？
其實你知道，成功者都有一些共通特質，
例如：勤奮、抗壓力強、能夠圓融圓滿的處理人際衝突、自信、耐挫力高、
問題解決能力強、能夠與人和睦相處、有許多朋友伙伴、擅長溝通、
具有說服力、值得信任、並且能夠影響人。
這些能力，
會是天生的嗎？
或是成長之後突然獲得的？
不，這些能力都是從小養成的正向積極習慣。
也就是成功者的習慣。
既然是習慣，就應該要從小培養，逐漸累積。
而不是期待著孩子能夠在成長的過程中突然的擁有。
 
成功者的習慣， 就是笛飛兒EQ教育一路以來在引導孩子的方向。
藉著專業的課程歷練與專業老師的引導，
讓孩子在自己的經驗裡感受、成長、歷練、學習，
不斷的挑戰與修正自己，養成成功者的習慣。
如果您發現您的孩子資質充沛， 
但不知道為什麼好像什麼地方卡住了，發揮不出來， 
或是老是不小心做一些讓自己惹麻煩的事。 
 那麼，歡迎您來到笛飛兒EQ教育。
 我們將是您最堅實的教養顧問與聯盟，
 與您一起發掘出孩子的潛質能力，作出最棒的自己！！
沒有什麼可以綁住一個人，除了他自己。
讓我們一起給孩子最堅實的能量， 讓孩子可以自信自在的乘風飛翔！




親職教育團體課程
歡迎來電洽詢
預約專線：02-2325-5685





 
 

 
 
 













智慧歷練班 (初階兒童EQ成長課程) | 笛飛兒EQ教育








































































































 






















Home/兒童EQ課程/常態型兒童教育課程/智慧歷練班 (初階兒童EQ成長課程) 








			智慧歷練班 (初階兒童EQ成長課程)		


eqedu 


			2017-06-28T10:57:54+00:00		



智慧歷練班 (初階兒童EQ成長課程)




親愛的爸媽，愛他，就該讓他上 EQ 課的七大理由







學校生活：自主學習動機強







自主學習囊括孩子的 自我管理、自我監控、延宕需求、控制誘惑、目標執行與設定…等EQ能力；抓住重點能力培養，省掉更多才藝/補習費用，孩子學習事半功倍。







學校生活：人際關係無入而不自得




人際相處大人都在學，從小開始學，懂得保護自己、尊重別人、展現自己、讓孩子在人際間無入而不自得。







家庭生活：親子關係共同成長




母子連心，看著孩子難受時難免想扶他一把，幫他一下；EQ課要求孩子獨立面頓問題與考驗，引導孩子長出思考智慧與相信自身能力；讓孩子擁有軟實力。親子關係更做到豐富的情感支持、但各自努力。







家庭生活：一針見血的教養方針，直接對症下藥







EQ課磨得不只是孩子，更是給你一本專屬於你與孩子的教養攻略；讓教養專家看透你孩子的特質與個性，給你最具個別性的教養方針。







社會生活：健全人格，不易被壓迫





「個性決定命運」EQ人格從小培育，孩子內心世界更勇於表達、解決，童年不陰霾、心理更健康，承擔壓力與考驗，自然不易被壓垮；甚至，讓孩子擁有開啟好命運的鑰匙。







社會生活：不隨波逐流，創造自己價值





十年內，不須『熱情與創意』就能做的事，都將被網路與機器人所取代；那你的孩子擁有熱情與創意了嗎?EQ課帶孩子探索自己的熱情所在、天賦之地，未來職場立足地不須苦苦尋覓、或擠破頭去，就能開創屬於自己的一片天地。







社會生活：自身能力就能創造幸福




幸福，無人能為任何人擔保/選擇他一輩子的幸福，包含自己的孩子。但從小給孩子創造幸福的EQ能力(選擇與承擔、思辨能力、自我覺察能力、自我認識能力、人際溝通能力、問題解決能力)，孩子的未來還有甚麼好擔心著的?








初階兒童EQ成長課程，另有課後親職分享，課程涵蓋自我管理、兒童情緒管理、兒童人際關係管理、兒童目標管理等面向


















如何讓孩子學習擁有 更多的方法解決問題、
更充分的自我認識、更智慧的人際相處（爭執）
更堅定的自我要求、更完整的目標達成、同時開啟自己更多的可能。
→ 引導孩子有效的學習：『自我管理』『情緒管理』『目標管理』『 關係管理』




笛飛兒 透過輕鬆有效的 EQ課程，讓孩子在遊戲中感受生活、感受問題、感受煩惱、感受成長!
 



360度完整智慧主題規劃




正向思考、尊重、認識情緒、認識自己、目標設定、情緒管理、溝通與澄清、協調他人、遵守指示、延宕需求、
挫折容忍、訊息解讀、接受拒絕與拒絕他人、讚美他人、感謝與感恩、領導、自我肯定、公開表達、接納批評




（笛飛兒目前累積課程300堂以上，EQ主題達70種以上）












課程規劃












80分鐘的完整課程內涵
．每周一次EQ學習，讓EQ學習不只在教室，更能落實於學校生活
．每週回顧與修正對於過往主題落實的困難癥結，穩固EQ能力
．每週充分的主題練習，帶給孩子支持與信心，勇敢迎接真實生活的挑戰












多元化主題課程設計，主題涵蓋： (欲了解更多課程主題，歡迎主動來電洽詢)
‧孩子自身能力：認識情緒、認識自己的優缺點、延宕需求(等一等)…
‧與人互動能力：有禮貌的認識新朋友、溝通、分享、接納拒絕…
‧團體互動能力：合作、自我表達與主張、衝突協商、領導…















課程實做內涵












小團體上課 1：12以下師生比
．最精緻化的學習，保障寶貝的EQ學習品質。
．小班制的課程帶領，將給每位孩子最佳的學習效果。
．真實同儕互動的情境，最能在不同主題下直接培植高EQ能力。












每週一次的課程規劃，20週完整學習
．60分鐘的課程學習，包含大量實際演練(50mins)+主題討論(10mins)，
讓孩子徹底演練，完整學習。
．20分鐘親師分享，EQ主題深入講解時間，讓親子EQ共同成長。












課後主題解說
．透過課後主題解說，將EQ概念打包，從家庭教育徹底落實EQ概念
．深入淺出的主題式講解，幫爸爸媽媽輕鬆找到發現孩子進步的具體方向
．親師主題概念溝通，成就更高效能的親職經驗，更快速與孩子找到幸福方式












每週主題學習單
‧課程結束後，幫寶貝能重覆溫習與回顧遊戲中的學習要點。
‧關心孩子學習的爸爸媽媽，亦可藉由學習要點，掌握孩子的課堂學習表現。
‧每周一次的課程記錄，幫爸爸媽媽完整見證孩子EQ成長足跡












EQ學習期末成績單
．透過成績單，讓爸爸媽媽對於寶貝進步能力一目了然
．全面性的透析孩子能力分佈，找出孩子最棒優勢
．整學期的進步成果，幫助家長對孩子未來能力培植，擁有更清晰的引導方向














 
 

 
 
 










eQ Technologic, Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































August 01, 2017 9:45 AM ET
Software

Company Overview of eQ Technologic, Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
eQ Technologic, Inc., an enterprise software company, provides eQube, a platform to address enterprise-wide needs for business intelligence and enterprise application data migration and integration. It provides eQube-Business Intelligence, a reporting, ad-hoc reporting, business intelligence, and analytics solution; eQube-Application Migration and Integration, a data migration and integration solution; and training and implementation services. The company serves various business enterprises, including aerospace and defense, automotive and transportation, consumer products, federal government, high tech and electronics, life sciences, and machinery and industrial product. eQ Technologic, Inc....
eQ Technologic, Inc., an enterprise software company, provides eQube, a platform to address enterprise-wide needs for business intelligence and enterprise application data migration and integration. It provides eQube-Business Intelligence, a reporting, ad-hoc reporting, business intelligence, and analytics solution; eQube-Application Migration and Integration, a data migration and integration solution; and training and implementation services. The company serves various business enterprises, including aerospace and defense, automotive and transportation, consumer products, federal government, high tech and electronics, life sciences, and machinery and industrial product. eQ Technologic, Inc. was formerly known as Technologic. The company was founded in 1995 and is based in Fort Washington, Pennsylvania with a development center in Pune, India.
Detailed Description


500 Office Center DriveSuite 400Fort Washington, PA 19034United StatesFounded in 1995



Phone: 215-891-9010

Fax: 215-359-1378

www.eq-technologic.com







Key Executives for eQ Technologic, Inc.




Mr. Dinesh Khaladkar


      	Chief Executive Officer and President
      








Mr. Ashutosh Khandekar


      	Director of Finance
      








Mr. Sanjeev Tamboli


      	Chief Technology Officer and Vice President of Products
      








Mr. Joseph P. Garay Esq.


      	Executive Vice President of Legal & Admin
      








Mr. Rustom Taraporevala


      	Director of Enterprise Quality
      





Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 



Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 'LightArrow Inc. United States /blossom LLC United States @RISK, Inc. United States @YourGate LLC United States 100Insights, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update


				\
	














 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact eQ Technologic, Inc., please visit www.eq-technologic.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close
































家長採訪分享 | 笛飛兒EQ教育




















































































 






















Home/家長採訪分享 








			家長採訪分享		


eqedu 


			2017-06-28T10:57:55+00:00		



家長採訪分享






「尊重」與「包容」- 奕碩寶貝的進步故事分享：


eqedu 


					2016-03-21T12:06:04+00:00				
 我不要”總是”被安排，靠自己才厲害 !！ 「永遠地配合者」是奕碩的代名詞；每當朋友說要玩什麼遊戲時，奕碩總是立刻答應，或無論朋友有甚麼意見、想法，他總是跟在朋友的後面跟隨，「尊重」與「包容」的接納朋友的一切需求。  […]
Read More



家駒寶貝的進步故事分享：


eqauth 


					2016-02-18T23:47:31+00:00				
 懶散爆衝哥，找回自己的力量，勇敢解決問題！ 還記得第一次跟家駒上課時，他的身體總是半躺在地上。 當我說：準備好的人請到藍色牆壁站好，相較其他孩子已經用跑百米的速度奔跑的同時，家駒還呆坐在原地，緩三秒才出發；當問問題時，  […]
Read More



利翔寶貝的進步故事分享分享：


eqauth 


					2015-11-27T23:53:47+00:00				
 方法轉個彎，問題解決，目標達成！ 我對利翔的第一印象是「不苟言笑的正直小帥哥」 怎麼說呢？讓我們一起往下看吧！ 學期初，利翔就像個小老師，只要班上有朋友開始聊天，他就會一臉嚴肅、外加點生氣的對著朋友說： 「叫你安靜是沒聽到嗎？！」 這就是利翔，堅持自己的原則和目標，不容許一絲錯誤或影響計畫的情況出現，對利翔來說指責他人是理直氣壯的，但這卻換來朋友對他的反感….  […]
Read More



張寧寶貝的進步故事分享：


eqauth 


					2015-11-27T23:53:14+00:00				
 把孩子的責任交回給他，我們家再也不打仗 其實一開始我只是想要張寧可以趕快把功課寫完，但因為這件事，我跟張寧簡直像是在打越戰一樣，每天兩個人你一來我一往的非常辛苦。 我每天都在不斷的發動提醒攻勢：『功課寫了沒？』『快去寫功課』，但是他都給我當耳邊風…  […]
Read More



韓皜寶貝的進步故事分享：


eqauth 


					2015-11-27T23:52:41+00:00				
 用柔軟包容的心，贏得好人緣 小麥色的肌膚、高壯的身體，是韓皜外表給人的第一印象。搭配上靈活矯健的身手，勇敢面對衝突的態度，正向來看，面對目標和任務韓皜的自我期待高，是很能創造成功經驗的孩子。但另一面來說，執著個性搭配澎湃的情感，  […]
Read More



秉澄寶貝的進步故事分享：


eqauth 


					2015-11-27T23:52:03+00:00				
 「正義糾察隊」惹人厭？！怎麼做才能又正義又有好人緣呢？！ 「老師他沒有坐好」、 「老師他講話沒有舉手」、 「老師他拿他的金幣」、 「老師他…」 這是我剛認識的秉澄，一位遵守指示能力極好的孩子；但同時也把自己的規則，一個一個刻在別人的身上。就像是一個單人糾察隊，看見別人沒有像自己一樣守規矩，馬上通報老師，請老師糾正。 「我是在做對的事呀！」秉澄說，但不知道為什麼的；每次糾正完身邊的朋友，就會突然淪為過街老鼠人人喊打！這樣的狀況反覆的在秉澄身上發生…  […]
Read More

 
1
2
3

Next










 
 

 
 
 








